test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-reeppin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - reeppin: # 2B
    reeppin+N+Sg+Nom: reeppin
    reeppin+N+Sg+Gen: reppin
    reeppin+N+Sg+Acc: reppin
    reeppin+N+Sg+Ill: repinân
    reeppin+N+Sg+Loc: repinist
    reeppin+N+Sg+Com: repináin
    reeppin+N+Sg+Abe: reppinttáá
    reeppin+N+Ess:    repinin
    reeppin+N+Par:    repinid
    reeppin+N+Pl+Nom: repineh
    reeppin+N+Pl+Gen: repinij
    reeppin+N+Pl+Acc: repinijd
    reeppin+N+Pl+Ill: repináid
    reeppin+N+Pl+Loc: repinijn
    reeppin+N+Pl+Com: repinijguin
    reeppin+N+Pl+Abe: repinijttáá
   
